Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.271

"Pasteurized"—Use of word regulated.

No person shall use the word "pasteurized" in connection with the sale, designation, advertising, labeling, or billing of milk, cream, or any milk product unless the same and all milk products used in the manufacture thereof consist exclusively of milk, skimmed milk, or cream that has been pasteurized in its final form.

[ 1989 c 354 s 7; 1961 c 11 s 15.32.420. Prior: 1919 c 192 s 71; RRS s 6233. Formerly RCW 15.32.420.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.